Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1
RIGHTS OF PERSONS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

27-10.5-101. Legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 906, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 983, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1350, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-102. Definitions - repeal.

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion of this section is effective until July 1, 2024.

]

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion of this section is effective July 1, 2024.

]

As used in this article 10.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authorized representative" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

(1.5)

[

Editor's note: Subsection (1.5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Case management agency" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-1702 (2).

"Case management services" has the same meaning as set forth in section

25.5-10-202

, C.R.S.

(2.3) "Case manager" has the same meaning as set forth in section

25.5-10-202

, C.R.S.

(2.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1442,
1, effective August 5, 2008.)

"Community-centered board" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

"Consent" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Contribution" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Court" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

(7.5)

[

Editor's note: Subsection (7.5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Defined service area" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-1702 (7).

"Department" means the department of human services.

"Designated service area" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

This subsection (9) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

"Developmental disabilities professional" has the same meaning as "intellectual and developmental disabilities professional" as set forth in subsection (21.5) of this section.

"Developmental disability" has the same meaning as "intellectual and developmental disability" as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Person with a developmental disability" has the same meaning as "person with an intellectual and developmental disability" as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Child with a developmental delay" means:

A person less than five years of age with delayed development as defined by the department; or

A person less than five years of age who is at risk of having a developmental disability as defined by the department.

The projected date for initiation of services and supports; and

The anticipated outcomes to be achieved by receiving the services and supports.

"Early intervention services and supports" means services described in and provided pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5, including education, training, and assistance in child development, parent education, therapies, and other activities for infants and toddlers and their families that are designed to meet the developmental needs of infants and toddlers including, but not limited to, cognition, speech, communication, physical, motor, vision, hearing, social-emotional, and self-help skills.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (13) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Eligible for supports and services" refers to any person with an intellectual and developmental disability or delay as determined eligible by the community-centered boards, pursuant to section

27-10.5-106

.

(13)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (13) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Eligible for supports and services" refers to any person with an intellectual and developmental disability or delay as determined eligible by the case management agency, pursuant to section

27-10.5-106

.

(13.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1442,
1, effective August 5, 2008.)

(13.7) "Enrolled" means that a person with an intellectual and developmental disability who is eligible for supports and services has been authorized, as defined by rules promulgated by the department, to participate in a program funded pursuant to this article.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of human services.

"Family" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

(15.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

"Gastrostomy tube" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Human rights committee" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

(17.5) Repealed.

"Inclusion" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2012.)

(19.5) "Individualized family service plan" or "IFSP" means a written plan developed pursuant to 20 U.S.C. sec. 1436 and 34 CFR 303.340 that authorizes the provision of early intervention services to an eligible child and the child's family. An IFSP shall serve as the individualized plan, pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (20) of this section, for a child from birth through two years of age.

"Individualized plan" means a written plan designed by an interdisciplinary team for the purpose of identifying:

(I) The needs and preferences of the person or family receiving services;

(II) The specific services and supports appropriate to meet those needs and preferences;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (20)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Every individualized plan will include a statement of agreement with the plan, signed by the person receiving services or other such person legally authorized to sign on behalf of the person and a representative of the community-centered board.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (20)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Every individualized plan must include a statement of agreement with the plan, signed by the person receiving services or other such person legally authorized to sign on behalf of the person and a representative of the case management agency.

Any other service or support plan, designated by the department, that meets all of the requirements of an individualized plan will be considered to be an individualized plan pursuant to this article.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

"Infants and toddlers" means a child with a developmental delay from birth through two years of age.

(21.5) "Intellectual and developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has professional training and experience in the intellectual and developmental disabilities field, as defined by the department.

"Interdependence" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Interdisciplinary team" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Least restrictive environment" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Person receiving services" means a person with an intellectual and developmental disability who is enrolled in a program funded pursuant to this article.

(25.5) "Program" means a specific group of services or supports as defined by rules promulgated by the department and for which funding is available pursuant to this article to a person with an intellectual and developmental disability who is eligible for supports and services.

Repealed.

"Regional center" means a facility or program operated directly by the department that provides services and supports to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

"Service agency" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

"Service and support coordination" means planning, locating, facilitating access to, coordinating, and reviewing all aspects of needed and preferred services, supports, and resources that are provided in cooperation with the person receiving services, the person's family, as appropriate, the family of a child with a developmental delay, and the involved public or private agencies. Planning includes the development or review of an existing individualized plan. "Service and support coordination" also includes the reassessment of the needs and preferences of the person receiving services or the needs and preferences of the family of the person, with maximum participation of the person receiving services and the person's parents, guardian, or authorized representative, as appropriate.

"Services and supports" means one or more of the following: Education, training, therapies, identification of natural supports, and other activities provided to:

Enable persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities to make responsible choices, exert greater control over their lives, experience presence and inclusion in their communities, develop their competencies and talents, maintain relationships, foster a sense of belonging, and experience personal security and self-respect; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

Enable families who choose or desire to maintain a family member with an intellectual and developmental disability at home to obtain support and to enjoy a typical lifestyle.

"Sterilization" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 906, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(4)(a) amended, p. 671, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 984, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(6)(b) amended, p. 1082, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 91:

(13.5) added, p. 1163, § 4, effective March 29.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1351, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(11)(a) amended, p. 1668, § 81, effective July 1; (8) and (14) amended, p. 1162, § 132, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2001:

(4) amended, p. 106, § 4, effective March 21.

L. 2002:

(11)(a) amended, p. 1024, § 47, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(20)(d) added, p. 480, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(2.5), (13.5), and (17.5) added, p. 1559, § 5, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

(15.5) added and (24) amended, p. 2179, § 1, effective June 5; entire section amended, p. 1442, § 1, effective August 5; (2.3) and (32) added, p. 2206, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(15.5) amended, (SB 09-044), ch. 57, p. 208, § 9, effective March 25.

L. 2010:

(13.7) and (25.5) added and (25) and (32) amended, (HB 10- 1213), ch. 220, p. 960, § 1, effective May 10; (26) repealed, (SB 10-208), ch. 314, p. 1472, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1786, § 2, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

IP, (13), and (20)(b) amended and (1.5) and (7.5) added, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 348, § 56, effective July 1, 2024; (3)(b) and (9)(b) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 348, 354, §§ 56, 70.

L. 2022:

(12) and (30) amended and (17.5) repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 860, § 109, effective July 1.

27-10.5-103. Duties of the executive director - rules - definition.

In order to implement the provisions of this article 10.5, the executive director shall carry out the following duties, subject to available appropriations:

Promote effective coordination with agencies serving persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities in order to improve continuity of services and supports for persons facing life transitions from toddler to preschool, school to adult life, and work to retirement;

Repealed.

Operate regional centers pursuant to part 3 of this article; and

Facilitate employment first policies and practices by:

Providing department input and assistance to the employment first advisory partnership established in part 3 of article 84 of title 8, C.R.S., in carrying out its duties; and

Presenting the reports and recommendations of the employment first advisory partnership to the department's legislative committee of reference pursuant to section 8-84-303 (7), C.R.S.

In accordance with section 24-4-103, and in coordination with the requirements of article 10 of title 25.5, the department shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this article 10.5, including but not limited to the following:

Standards for services and supports, including preparation of individualized plans;

Purchase of services and supports and financial administration;

Procedures for resolving disputes over eligibility determination and the modification, denial, or termination of services;

Procedures for admission to programs contained in this article;

Systems of quality assurance and data collection;

The rights of a person receiving services;

Confidentiality of records of a person receiving services;

Designation of authorized representatives and delineation of their rights and duties pursuant to this article;

The establishment of guidelines and procedures for authorization of persons for administration of nutrition and fluids through gastrostomy tubes.

The department shall require that a service agency providing residential or day program services or supports have a staff member qualified pursuant to subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (i) on duty at any time the facility administers said nutrition and fluids through gastrostomy tubes, and that the facility maintain a written record of each nutrient or fluid administered to each person receiving services, including the time and the amount of the nutrient or fluid.

A person who is not otherwise authorized by law to administer nutrition and fluids through gastrostomy tubes is allowed to perform the duties only under the supervision of a licensed nurse or physician. A person who administers nutrition and fluids in compliance with the provisions of this subsection (2)(i) is exempt from the licensing requirements of the "Colorado Medical Practice Act", article 240 of title 12, and the "Nurse and Nurse Aide Practice Act", article 255 of title 12. Nothing in this subsection (2)(i) shall be deemed to authorize the administration of medications through gastrostomy tubes. A person administering medications through gastrostomy tubes is subject to the requirements of part 3 of article 1.5 of title 25.

For purposes of this paragraph (i), "administration" means assisting a person in the ingestion of nutrition or fluids according to the direction and supervision of a licensed nurse or physician.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 908, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1640, § 47, effective July 19.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 987, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(j) repealed and (3) amended, pp. 1083, 1082, §§ 9, 2, effective April 9.

L. 91:

(2)(k) added, p. 1164, § 6, effective March 29; (1)(f) amended, p. 1859, § 22, effective April 11.

L. 92:

(2)(k)(V) repealed, p. 2011, § 5, effective June 2; entire section amended, p. 1357, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1162, § 133, effective July 1, 1994; (1)(f) repealed, p. 1121, § 32, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(1)(f) RC&RE, p. 2613, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(2) and (2)(k)(III) amended, p. 714, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(f) amended, p. 2021, § 112, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1559, § 6, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

(1)(h) and (2)(l) amended, p. 1448, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

IP(2) amended, (SB 09-044), ch. 57, p. 208, § 10, effective March 25.

L. 2010:

(2)(e) amended, (SB 10-208), ch. 314, p. 1472, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2013:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1792, § 3, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2016:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(d) added, (SB 16-077), ch. 360, p. 1507, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP(2) and (2)(i)(III) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1712, § 197, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(2)(i)(III) amended, (HB 20-1183), ch. 157, p. 704, § 65, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 21-275), ch. 393, p. 2613, § 6, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1)(b) and (2)(j) repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 861, § 110, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 92-096 and Senate Bill 92-133 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act repealing subsection (1)(f), see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act recreating and reenacting subsection (1)(f), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 16-077, see section 1 of chapter 360, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

27-10.5-103.5. Community centered boards and service agencies - local public procurement units - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 1077, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1476, § 37, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(2) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-104. Authorized services and supports - conditions of funding - purchase of services and supports - boards of county commissioners - appropriation - repeal.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Subject to annual appropriations by the general assembly, the department shall provide or purchase, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, authorized services and supports from community-centered boards or service agencies for persons who have been determined to be eligible for such services and supports pursuant to section 27-10.5-106, and as specified in the eligible person's individualized plan. Those services and supports may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Subject to annual appropriations by the general assembly, the department shall provide or purchase, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, authorized long-term services and supports from case management agencies or service agencies for persons who have been determined to be eligible for such long-term services and supports pursuant to section 27-10.5-106, and as specified in the eligible person's individualized plan. Those long-term services and supports may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

Repealed.

Case management services;

Day services and supports that offer opportunities for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities to experience and actively participate in valued adult roles in the community. These services and supports will enable persons receiving services to access and participate in community activities, such as work, recreation, higher education, and senior citizen activities. Day services and supports, including early intervention services, may also include the administration of nutrition or fluids through gastrostomy tubes, if administered by a person authorized pursuant to section 27-10.5-103 (2)(i) and supervised by a licensed nurse or physician.

Residential services and supports, including an array of training, learning, experiential, and support activities provided in living alternatives designed to meet the individual needs of persons receiving services and may include the administration of nutrition or fluids through gastrostomy tubes, if administered by a person authorized pursuant to section 27-10.5-103 (2)(i) and supervised by a licensed nurse or physician; and

Ancillary services, including activities that are secondary but integral to the provision of the services and supports specified in this subsection (1).

Service agencies receiving funds pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall comply with all of the provisions of this article and the rules promulgated thereunder.

Repealed.

The department may purchase services and supports, including service and support coordination, directly from service agencies if:

Required by the federal requirements for the state to qualify for federal funds under Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, including programs authorized pursuant to part 4 of article 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.; or

The executive director has determined that a service or support provided or purchased by a designated community-centered board does not meet established standards and the continuation of purchase of the service or support through the community-centered board is not in the best interests of the persons receiving services.

This subsection (4)(a)(II) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The department shall only purchase services and supports directly from those community-centered boards or service agencies that meet established standards.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The department shall only purchase long-term services and supports directly from those service agencies that meet established standards.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the provision of services and supports, including case management services, directly by the department through regional centers, for persons receiving services in regional centers.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the provision of services and supports, including case management services, directly by the department.

Each year the general assembly shall appropriate moneys to the department to provide or purchase services and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities pursuant to this section. Unless specifically provided otherwise, services and supports shall be purchased on the basis of state funding less any federal or cash funds received for general operating expenses from any other state or federal source, less funds available to a person receiving residential services or supports after such person receives an allowance for personal needs or for meeting other obligations imposed by federal or state law. The yearly appropriation, when combined with all other sources of funds, shall in no case exceed one hundred percent of the approved program costs as determined by the general assembly. Funds received for capital construction shall not be considered in the calculation for the distribution of funds under the provisions of this section.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 909, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(6)(b) amended, p. 1640, § 48, effective July 19.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 988, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2) and (8) amended, p. 1082, § 3, effective April 9; (7)(b) amended, p. 812, § 13, effective May 24.

L. 91:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1163, § 5, effective March 29.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1359, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1789, § 75, effective June 6; IP(1), IP(4)(a), and (7)(a) amended, p. 1162, § 134, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(7)(b) amended, p. 823, § 51, effective April 27.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 472, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 2216, § 1, effective June 5; (4)(a.7) added, p. 2180, § 2, effective June 5; (1) and (3) amended, p. 1448, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(7)(b) amended, (HB 10-1013), ch. 399, p. 1916, § 48, effective June 10.

L. 2013:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1794, § 4, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (4)(b) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 348, § 57, effective July 1, 2024; (4)(a)(II)(B) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 348, 354, §§ 57, 70.

L. 2022:

(1)(a), (3), and (5)(b) repealed, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 861, § 111, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 08-1366, Senate Bill 08-002, and House Bill 08-1220 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending the introductory portions to subsections (1) and (4)(a) and subsection (7)(a), see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

27-10.5-104.2. Services and supports - waiting list reduction - cash fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 2209, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (SB 09-228), ch. 410, p. 2264, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), and (3)(a) amended and (1.5) added, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1796, § 5, effective May 28; (6) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-104.5. Case management agencies when acting as a service agency - money - rules - repeal.

A service agency, including a community centered board when acting as a service agency, shall comply with the requirements set forth in this article and the rules promulgated thereunder.

This subsection (1) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1363, § 5, effective July 1, 1992.)

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (3) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The department shall promulgate rules to implement the purchase of services and supports from a community-centered board or a service agency. The rules shall include, but need not be limited to:

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (3) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The department shall promulgate rules to implement the purchase of long-term services and supports from a case management agency or a service agency. The rules must include, but need not be limited to:

Terms and conditions necessary to promote the effective delivery of services and supports;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Procedures for obtaining an annual audit of designated community-centered boards and service agencies not affiliated with a designated community-centered board to provide financial information deemed necessary by the department to establish costs of services and supports and to ensure proper management of moneys received pursuant to section

27-10.5-104

;

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Procedures for obtaining an annual audit of case management agencies and service agencies not affiliated with a case management agency to provide financial information deemed necessary by the department to establish costs of long-term services and supports and to ensure proper management of money received pursuant to section

27-10.5-104

;

Delineation of a system to resolve contractual disputes between the department and designated community-centered boards or service agencies and between designated community-centered boards and service agencies, including the contesting of any rates that the designated community-centered boards charge to service agencies based upon a percentage of the rates that service agencies charge for services and supports;

This subsection (3)(c) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(d) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Specification of what services and supports are to be reimbursed by the department and secondarily by the community-centered board, the source of reimbursement, actual service or support costs, incentives, and program service objectives which affect reimbursement;

(d)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(d) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Specification of what long-term services and supports are to be reimbursed by the department and secondarily by the case management agencies, the source of reimbursement, actual long-term service or support costs, incentives, and program service objectives which affect reimbursement;

The methods of coordinating the purchase of services and supports, including, but not limited to, service and support coordination, with other federal, state, and local programs which provide funding for authorized services and supports;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1363, § 5, effective July 1, 1992.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 2219, § 2, effective June 5, 2008.)

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(i) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Criteria for and limitations on any rates that designated community-centered boards charge to service agencies based upon a percentage of the rates that service agencies charge for services and supports.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(i) is effective July 1, 2024.] Criteria for and limitations on any rates that case management agencies charge to service agencies based upon a percentage of the rates that service agencies charge for long-term services and supports.

(3.5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.5) is effective until July 1, 2024.

]

Any incorporated service agency which is registered in Colorado as a foreign corporation shall organize a local advisory board consisting of individuals who reside within the designated service area. Such advisory board shall be representative of the community at large and persons receiving services and their families.

(3.5)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Any incorporated service agency which is registered in Colorado as a foreign corporation shall organize a local advisory board consisting of individuals who reside within the defined service area. The advisory board must be representative of the community at large and persons receiving services and their families.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Upon a determination by the executive director that services or supports have not been provided in accordance with the program or financial administration standards specified in this article and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the executive director may reduce, suspend, or withhold payment to a designated community centered board, service agency under contract with a designated community centered board, or service agency from which the department of human services purchased services or supports directly. When the executive director decides to reduce, suspend, or withhold payment, the executive director shall specify the reasons therefor and the actions which are necessary to bring the service agency into compliance.

(4)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Upon a determination by the executive director that long-term services or supports have not been provided in accordance with the program or financial administration standards specified in this article 10.5 and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, the executive director may reduce, suspend, or withhold payment to a case management agency, service agency under contract with a case management agency, or service agency from which the department of human services purchased long-term services or supports directly. When the executive director decides to reduce, suspend, or withhold payment, the executive director shall specify the reasons therefor and the actions which are necessary to bring the service agency into compliance.

Nothing in this article or in any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto and no actions taken by the executive director pursuant to this article shall be construed to affect the obtaining of funds from local authorities, including those funds obtained from a mill levy assessed by a county or municipality for the purpose of purchasing services or supports for persons with developmental disabilities, or to require that such funds from local authorities be used to supplant state or federal funds available for purchasing services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1363, § 5, effective July 1, 1992.)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 991, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(6) amended, p. 1083, § 4, effective April 9.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1363, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3)(d) and (4) amended, p. 1163, § 135, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 2219, § 2, effective June 5; IP(3) and (3)(a) amended, p. 2180, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2009:

(1), IP(3), and (3)(b) amended, (SB 09-044), ch. 57, p. 208, § 11, effective March 25.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1797, § 6, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2021:

IP(3), (3)(b), (3)(d), (3)(i), (3.5), and (4) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 349, § 58, effective July 1, 2024; (1)(b) and (3)(c)(II) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 349, 354, §§ 58, 70.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (3) by House Bill 08-1220 and Senate Bill 08-002 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

27-10.5-105. Case management agencies - purchase of services and supports.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Once a community-centered board has been designated pursuant to section 25.5-10-209, it shall, subject to available appropriations:

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Once a case management agency has been designated pursuant to section 25.5-6-1703, it shall, subject to available appropriations:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Determine eligibility and develop an individualized plan for each person who receives services or supports pursuant to section 25.5-10-211; except that, for a child from birth through two years of age, eligibility determination and development of an individualized family service plan shall be made pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5;

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Determine eligibility and develop an individualized plan for each person who receives long-term services or supports pursuant to section 25.5-6-1704; except that, for a child from birth through two years of age, eligibility determination and development of an individualized family service plan must be made pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5;

Provide case management services, including service and support coordination and periodic reviews, for persons receiving services and families with children with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Obtain or provide early intervention services and supports pursuant to part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5;

Take steps to notify eligible persons, and their families as appropriate, regarding the availability of services and supports;

Pursuant to section 26.5-3-404, collaborate with the department of early childhood as it develops and implements a statewide plan for public education outreach and awareness efforts related to part C child find and the availability of early intervention services.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 910, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 992, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(f) repealed and (4) amended, p. 1083, §§ 9, 5, effective April 9.

L. 90:

(2)(a) amended, p. 412, § 42, effective June 7.

L. 92:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1365, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 93:

IP(1) amended, p. 1163, § 136, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1562, § 7, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 2220, § 3, effective June 5; entire section amended, p. 1450, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(2)(d) amended, (HB 10-1213), ch. 220, p. 961, § 2, effective May 10; (2)(f) repealed, (SB 10-208), ch. 314, p. 1472, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2013:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1797, § 7, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1270, § 33, effective May 31.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 350, § 59, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), and (1)(e) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 862, §§ 112, 113, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

27-10.5-105.5. Revocation of designation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 995, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(3) amended, p. 1083, § 6, effective April 9.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1368, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(4) added by revision, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, pp. 1799, 1813, §§ 13, 56.

27-10.5-106. Eligibility determination.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until July 1, 2024.

]

Any person may request an evaluation pursuant to section 25.5-10-211, C.R.S., to determine whether he or she has an intellectual and developmental disability and is eligible to receive services and supports pursuant to this article. Application for eligibility determination shall be made to the designated community-centered board in the designated service area where the person resides.

27-10.5-106. Eligibility determination.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Any person may request an evaluation pursuant to section 25.5-6-1704 to determine whether the person has an intellectual and developmental disability and is eligible to receive long-term services and supports pursuant to this article 10.5. Application for eligibility determination must be made to the case management agency in the defined service area where the person resides.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 910, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 995, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(4) amended, p. 1083, § 7, effective April 9.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1368, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1163, § 137, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2007:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1564, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1453, § 5, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 09-044), ch. 57, p. 208, § 12, effective March 25.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) and (2) amended and (5) added, (HB 10-1213), ch. 220, p. 961, § 3, effective May 10.

L. 2013:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1798, § 8, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1270, § 34, effective May 31.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 350, § 60, effective July 1, 2024.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.